Missouri, session 2026, SB1345.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 563.016, 563.031, 571.010, 571.020,
2 571.030, 571.101, 571.104, 571.107, 571.205, 571.210, 571.215,
3 577.703, and 577.712, RSMo, are repealed and seventeen new
4 sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
5 290.148, 563.031, 563.085, 571.010, 571.020, 571.030, 571.069,
6 571.101, 571.104, 571.107, 571.108, 571.109, 571.205, 571.210,
7 571.215, 577.703, and 577.712, to read as follows:
1 290.148. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
2 contrary, no employer in this state shall discharge or
3 otherwise terminate the employment of any employee on the
4 basis of such employee having a firearm in the employee's
5 vehicle on the employer's property when the employee is
6 arriving to or leaving from the employer's property for
7 employment purposes or when the employee is conducting
8 activities within the course and scope of his or her
9 employment, provided that the employee's vehicle is locked,
10 the firearm is not visible, and the employee is not
11 prohibited from possessing a firearm by law. An employer
12 shall not be civilly liable for any injuries or damages
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1345 2
13 resulting from the use of firearms that are stored in
14 compliance with this section.
1 563.031. 1. A person may, subject to the provisions
2 of subsection 2 of this section, use physical force upon
3 another person when and to the extent he or she reasonably
4 believes such force to be necessary to defend himself or
5 herself or a third person from what he or she reasonably
6 believes to be the use or imminent use of unlawful force by
7 such other person, unless:
8 (1) The actor was the initial aggressor; except that
9 in such case his or her use of force is nevertheless
10 justifiable provided:
11 (a) He or she has withdrawn from the encounter and
12 effectively communicated such withdrawal to such other
13 person but the latter persists in continuing the incident by
14 the use or threatened use of unlawful force; or
15 (b) He or she is a law enforcement officer and as such
16 is an aggressor pursuant to section 563.046; or
17 (c) The aggressor is justified under some other
18 provision of this chapter or other provision of law;
19 (2) Under the circumstances as the actor reasonably
20 believes them to be, the person whom he or she seeks to
21 protect would not be justified in using such protective
22 force;
23 (3) The actor was attempting to commit, committing, or
24 escaping after the commission of a forcible felony.
25 2. A person shall not use deadly force upon another
26 person under the circumstances specified in subsection 1 of
27 this section unless:
28 (1) He or she reasonably believes that such deadly
29 force is necessary to protect himself, or herself or her

SB 1345 3
30 unborn child, or another against death, serious physical
31 injury, or any forcible felony;
32 (2) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
33 enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to
34 unlawfully enter a dwelling, residence, place of employment,
35 or vehicle lawfully occupied by such person; or
36 (3) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
37 enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to
38 unlawfully enter private property that is owned or leased by
39 an individual, or is occupied by an individual who has been
40 given specific authority by the property owner to occupy the
41 property, or is a retail establishment or other place of
42 business wherein an individual using such force has a right
43 to be, claiming a justification of using protective force
44 under this section.
45 3. A person does not have a duty to retreat:
46 (1) From a dwelling, residence, place of employment,
47 or vehicle where the person is not unlawfully entering or
48 unlawfully remaining;
49 (2) From private property that is owned or leased by
50 such individual; or
51 (3) If the person is in any other location such person
52 has the right to be.
53 4. The justification afforded by this section extends
54 to the use of physical restraint as protective force
55 provided that the actor takes all reasonable measures to
56 terminate the restraint as soon as it is reasonable to do so.
57 5. [The defendant shall have the burden of injecting
58 the issue of justification under this section. If a
59 defendant asserts that his or her use of force is described
60 under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the
61 burden shall then be on the state to prove beyond a

SB 1345 4
62 reasonable doubt that the defendant did not reasonably
63 believe that the use of such force was necessary to defend
64 against what he or she reasonably believed was the use or
65 imminent use of unlawful force] There shall be a presumption
66 of reasonableness under this section that the defendant
67 believed such force was necessary to defend himself or
68 herself or a third person from what he or she believed to be
69 the use or imminent use of unlawful force by another person.
1 563.085. 1. A person who uses or threatens to use
2 force pursuant to section 563.031 is justified in such
3 conduct and is immune from criminal prosecution and civil
4 action for the use or threatened use of such force by the
5 person, personal representative, or heirs of the person
6 against whom the force was used or threatened, unless the
7 person against whom force was used or threatened is a law
8 enforcement officer who was acting in the performance of his
9 or her official duties and the officer identified himself or
10 herself in accordance with any applicable law or the person
11 using or threatening to use force knew or reasonably should
12 have known that the person was a law enforcement officer.
13 As used in this subsection, the term "criminal prosecution"
14 includes arresting, detaining in custody, and charging or
15 prosecuting the defendant.
16 2. A law enforcement agency may use standard
17 procedures for investigating the use or threatened use of
18 force as described in subsection 1 of this section, but the
19 agency may not arrest the person for using or threatening to
20 use force unless the agency determines that there is
21 probable cause that the force that was used or threatened
22 was unlawful.
23 3. In a criminal prosecution or civil action, once a
24 prima facie claim of self-defense immunity has been raised

SB 1345 5
25 by the defendant at a pretrial immunity hearing, the burden
26 of proof by clear and convincing evidence is on the party
27 seeking to overcome the immunity provided in subsection 1 of
28 this section.
1 571.010. As used in this chapter, the following terms
2 shall mean:
3 (1) "Antique, curio or relic firearm", any firearm so
4 defined by the National Gun Control Act, 18 U.S.C. Title 26,
5 Section 5845, and the United States Treasury/Bureau of
6 Alcohol Tobacco and Firearms, 27 CFR Section 178.11:
7 (a) "Antique firearm" is any firearm not designed or
8 redesigned for using rim fire or conventional center fire
9 ignition with fixed ammunition and manufactured in or before
10 1898, said ammunition not being manufactured any longer;
11 this includes any matchlock, wheel lock, flintlock,
12 percussion cap or similar type ignition system, or replica
13 thereof;
14 (b) "Curio or relic firearm" is any firearm deriving
15 value as a collectible weapon due to its unique design,
16 ignition system, operation or at least fifty years old,
17 associated with a historical event, renown personage or
18 major war;
19 (2) "Blackjack", any instrument that is designed or
20 adapted for the purpose of stunning or inflicting physical
21 injury by striking a person, and which is readily capable of
22 lethal use;
23 (3) "Blasting agent", any material or mixture,
24 consisting of fuel and oxidizer that is intended for
25 blasting, but not otherwise defined as an explosive under
26 this section, provided that the finished product, as mixed
27 for use of shipment, cannot be detonated by means of a
28 numbered 8 test blasting cap when unconfined;

SB 1345 6
29 (4) "Concealable firearm", any firearm with a barrel
30 less than sixteen inches in length, measured from the face
31 of the bolt or standing breech;
32 (5) "Deface", to alter or destroy the manufacturer's
33 or importer's serial number or any other distinguishing
34 number or identification mark;
35 (6) "Detonator", any device containing a detonating
36 charge that is used for initiating detonation in an
37 explosive, including but not limited to, electric blasting
38 caps of instantaneous and delay types, nonelectric blasting
39 caps for use with safety fuse or shock tube and detonating
40 cord delay connectors;
41 (7) "Explosive weapon", any explosive, incendiary, or
42 poison gas bomb or similar device designed or adapted for
43 the purpose of inflicting death, serious physical injury, or
44 substantial property damage; or any device designed or
45 adapted for delivering or shooting such a weapon. For the
46 purposes of this subdivision, the term "explosive" shall
47 mean any chemical compound mixture or device, the primary or
48 common purpose of which is to function by explosion,
49 including but not limited to, dynamite and other high
50 explosives, pellet powder, initiating explosives,
51 detonators, safety fuses, squibs, detonating cords, igniter
52 cords, and igniters or blasting agents;
53 (8) "Firearm", any weapon that is designed or adapted
54 to expel a projectile by the action of an explosive;
55 (9) "Firearm silencer", any instrument, attachment, or
56 appliance that is designed or adapted to muffle the noise
57 made by the firing of any firearm;
58 (10) "Gas gun", any gas ejection device, weapon,
59 cartridge, container or contrivance other than a gas bomb
60 that is designed or adapted for the purpose of ejecting any

SB 1345 7
61 poison gas that will cause death or serious physical injury,
62 but not any device that ejects a repellant or temporary
63 incapacitating substance;
64 (11) "Intoxicated", substantially impaired mental or
65 physical capacity resulting from introduction of any
66 substance into the body;
67 (12) "Knife", any dagger, dirk, stiletto, or bladed
68 hand instrument that is readily capable of inflicting
69 serious physical injury or death by cutting or stabbing a
70 person. For purposes of this chapter, knife does not
71 include any ordinary pocketknife with no blade more than
72 four inches in length;
73 (13) "Knuckles", any instrument that consists of
74 finger rings or guards made of a hard substance that is
75 designed or adapted for the purpose of inflicting serious
76 physical injury or death by striking a person with a fist
77 enclosed in the knuckles;
78 (14) "Machine gun", any firearm that is capable of
79 firing more than one shot automatically, without manual
80 reloading, by a single function of the trigger;
81 (15) "Projectile weapon", any bow, crossbow, pellet
82 gun, slingshot or other weapon that is not a firearm, which
83 is capable of expelling a projectile that could inflict
84 serious physical injury or death by striking or piercing a
85 person;
86 (16) "Rifle", any firearm designed [or adapted] to be
87 fired from the shoulder and to use the energy of the
88 explosive in a fixed metallic cartridge to fire a projectile
89 through a rifled bore by a single function of the trigger;
90 (17) "School", any charter school, as such term is
91 defined in section 160.400, any private school, as such term

SB 1345 8
92 is defined in section 166.700, or any public school, as such
93 term is defined in section 160.011;
94 (18) "Short barrel", a barrel length of less than
95 sixteen inches for a rifle and eighteen inches for a
96 shotgun, both measured from the face of the bolt or standing
97 breech, or an overall rifle or shotgun length of less than
98 twenty-six inches;
99 (19) "Shotgun", any firearm designed or adapted to be
100 fired from the shoulder and to use the energy of the
101 explosive in a fixed shotgun shell to fire a number of shot
102 or a single projectile through a smooth bore barrel by a
103 single function of the trigger;
104 (20) "Spring gun", any fused, timed or nonmanually
105 controlled trap or device designed or adapted to set off an
106 explosion for the purpose of inflicting serious physical
107 injury or death;
108 (21) "Switchblade knife", any knife which has a blade
109 that folds or closes into the handle or sheath, and:
110 (a) That opens automatically by pressure applied to a
111 button or other device located on the handle; or
112 (b) That opens or releases from the handle or sheath
113 by the force of gravity or by the application of centrifugal
114 force.
1 571.020. 1. A person commits an offense if such
2 person knowingly possesses, manufactures, transports,
3 repairs, or sells:
4 (1) An explosive weapon;
5 (2) An explosive, incendiary or poison substance or
6 material with the purpose to possess, manufacture or sell an
7 explosive weapon;
8 (3) A gas gun;

SB 1345 9
9 (4) A bullet or projectile which explodes or detonates
10 upon impact because of an independent explosive charge after
11 having been shot from a firearm; [or]
12 (5) [Knuckles; or
13 (6) Any of the following in violation of federal law:
14 (a)] A machine gun;
15 [(b)] (6) A short-barreled rifle or shotgun;
16 [(c)] (7) A firearm silencer; or
17 [(d)] (8) A switchblade knife.
18 2. A person does not commit an offense pursuant to
19 this section if his or her conduct involved any of the items
20 in subdivisions (1) to [(5)] (8) of subsection 1, the item
21 was possessed in conformity with any applicable federal law,
22 and the conduct:
23 (1) Was incident to the performance of official duty
24 by the Armed Forces, National Guard, a governmental law
25 enforcement agency, or a penal institution; or
26 (2) Was incident to engaging in a lawful commercial or
27 business transaction with an organization enumerated in
28 subdivision (1) of this [section] subsection; or
29 (3) Was incident to using an explosive weapon in a
30 manner reasonably related to a lawful industrial or
31 commercial enterprise; or
32 (4) Was incident to displaying the weapon in a public
33 museum or exhibition; or
34 (5) Was incident to using the weapon in a manner
35 reasonably related to a lawful dramatic performance; or
36 (6) Was lawful according to any state law.
37 3. An offense pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3)
38 [or], (5), (6), (7), or (8) of subsection 1 of this section
39 is a class D felony; a crime pursuant to subdivision (4) [or

SB 1345 10
40 (5)] of subsection 1 of this section is a class A
41 misdemeanor.
1 571.030. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful
2 use of weapons[, except as otherwise provided by sections
3 571.101 to 571.121,] if he or she knowingly:
4 (1) Carries concealed upon or about his or her person
5 a knife, a firearm, a blackjack or any other weapon readily
6 capable of lethal use [into any area where firearms are
7 restricted under section 571.107; or]:
8 (a) Into any public higher education institution or
9 public elementary or secondary school facility without the
10 consent of the governing body of the higher education
11 institution or a school official or the district school
12 board, unless the person is a teacher or administrator of an
13 elementary or secondary school who has been designated by
14 his or her school district as a school protection officer
15 and is carrying a firearm in a school within that district,
16 in which case no consent is required;
17 (b) Onto any school bus or onto the premises of any
18 function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
19 officials or the district school board, unless the weapon is
20 possessed by an adult to facilitate a school-sanctioned
21 firearm-related event or club event;
22 (c) Into any police, sheriff, or Missouri state
23 highway patrol office or station without the consent of the
24 chief law enforcement officer in charge of that office or
25 station;
26 (d) Into the facility of any adult or juvenile
27 detention or correctional institution, prison, or jail;
28 (e) Into any courthouse solely occupied by the
29 municipal, circuit, appellate, or supreme court, or any
30 courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries, or other

SB 1345 11
31 rooms of any such court, regardless of whether such court
32 solely occupies the building in question. This paragraph
33 shall also include, but not be limited to, any juvenile,
34 family, drug, or other court offices, or any room or office
35 wherein any of the courts or offices listed under this
36 subdivision are temporarily conducting any business within
37 the jurisdiction of such courts or offices. Nothing in this
38 paragraph shall preclude those persons listed under
39 subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section while within
40 their jurisdiction and on duty; those persons listed under
41 subdivision (2), (4), or (10) of subsection 2 of this
42 section; or such other persons who serve in a law
43 enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by
44 supreme court rule from carrying a concealed firearm within
45 any of the areas described under this paragraph;
46 (f) Into any meeting of the general assembly or a
47 committee of the general assembly;
48 (g) Into any area of an airport to which access is
49 controlled by the inspection of persons and property;
50 (h) Into any place where the carrying of a firearm is
51 prohibited by federal law;
52 (i) Onto any private property whose owner has posted
53 the premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by
54 means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place
55 of a minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with
56 the writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch; or
57 (j) Into any sports arena or stadium with a seating
58 capacity of five thousand or more that is under the
59 management of or leased to a private entity, including a
60 professional sports team; or
61 (2) Sets a spring gun; or

SB 1345 12
62 (3) Discharges or shoots a firearm into a dwelling
63 house, a railroad train, boat, aircraft, or motor vehicle as
64 defined in section 302.010, or any building or structure
65 used for the assembling of people; or
66 (4) Exhibits, in the presence of one or more persons,
67 any weapon readily capable of lethal use in an angry or
68 threatening manner; or
69 (5) Has a firearm or projectile weapon readily capable
70 of lethal use on his or her person, while he or she is
71 intoxicated, and handles or otherwise uses such firearm or
72 projectile weapon in either a negligent or unlawful manner
73 or discharges such firearm or projectile weapon unless
74 acting in self-defense; or
75 (6) Discharges a firearm within one hundred yards of
76 any occupied schoolhouse, courthouse, or church building; or
77 (7) Discharges or shoots a firearm at a mark, at any
78 object, or at random, on, along or across a public highway
79 or discharges or shoots a firearm into any outbuilding; or
80 (8) [Carries a firearm or any other weapon readily
81 capable of lethal use into any church or place where people
82 have assembled for worship, or into any election precinct on
83 any election day, or into any building owned or occupied by
84 any agency of the federal government, state government, or
85 political subdivision thereof; or
86 (9)] Discharges or shoots a firearm at or from a motor
87 vehicle, as defined in section 301.010, discharges or shoots
88 a firearm at any person, or at any other motor vehicle, or
89 at any building or habitable structure, unless the person
90 was lawfully acting in self-defense; or
91 [(10) Carries a firearm, whether loaded or unloaded,
92 or any other weapon readily capable of lethal use into any
93 school, onto any school bus, or onto the premises of any

SB 1345 13
94 function or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school
95 officials or the district school board; or
96 (11)] (9) Possesses a firearm while also knowingly in
97 possession of a controlled substance that is sufficient for
98 a felony violation of section 579.015.
99 2. [Subdivisions (1), (8), and (10)] Paragraphs (a),
100 (b), (c), (d), (f), (i), and (j) of subdivision (1) of
101 subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to the persons
102 described in subdivision (1), (3), (6), or (7) of this
103 subsection, regardless of whether such uses are reasonably
104 associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
105 person's official duties except as otherwise provided in
106 this subsection. Subdivisions (3), (4), (6), (7), and [(9)]
107 (8) of subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to or
108 affect any of the following persons, when such uses are
109 reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
110 fulfillment of such person's official duties, except as
111 otherwise provided in this subsection:
112 (1) All state, county and municipal peace officers who
113 have completed the training required by the police officer
114 standards and training commission pursuant to sections
115 590.030 to 590.050 and who possess the duty and power of
116 arrest for violation of the general criminal laws of the
117 state or for violation of ordinances of counties or
118 municipalities of the state, whether such officers are on or
119 off duty, and whether such officers are within or outside of
120 the law enforcement agency's jurisdiction, or all qualified
121 retired peace officers, as defined in subsection 12 of this
122 section, and who carry the identification defined in
123 subsection 13 of this section, or any person summoned by
124 such officers to assist in making arrests or preserving the
125 peace while actually engaged in assisting such officer;

SB 1345 14
126 (2) Wardens, superintendents and keepers of prisons,
127 penitentiaries, jails and other institutions for the
128 detention of persons accused or convicted of crime;
129 (3) Members of the Armed Forces or National Guard
130 while performing their official duty;
131 (4) Those persons vested by Article V, Section 1 of
132 the Constitution of Missouri with the judicial power of the
133 state and those persons vested by Article III of the
134 Constitution of the United States with the judicial power of
135 the United States, the members of the federal judiciary;
136 (5) Any person whose bona fide duty is to execute
137 process, civil or criminal;
138 (6) Any federal probation officer or federal flight
139 deck officer as defined under the federal flight deck
140 officer program, 49 U.S.C. Section 44921, regardless of
141 whether such officers are on duty, or within the law
142 enforcement agency's jurisdiction;
143 (7) Any state probation or parole officer, including
144 supervisors and members of the parole board;
145 (8) Any corporate security advisor meeting the
146 definition and fulfilling the requirements of the
147 regulations established by the department of public safety
148 under section 590.750;
149 (9) Any coroner, deputy coroner, medical examiner, or
150 assistant medical examiner;
151 (10) Any municipal or county prosecuting attorney or
152 assistant prosecuting attorney; circuit attorney or
153 assistant circuit attorney; municipal, associate, or circuit
154 judge; or any person appointed by a court to be a special
155 prosecutor who has completed the firearms safety training
156 course required under subsection 2 of section 571.111;

SB 1345 15
157 (11) Any member of a fire department or fire
158 protection district who is employed on a full-time basis as
159 a fire investigator and who has a valid concealed carry
160 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a valid
161 concealed carry permit under section 571.111 when such uses
162 are reasonably associated with or are necessary to the
163 fulfillment of such person's official duties; and
164 (12) Upon the written approval of the governing body
165 of a fire department or fire protection district, any paid
166 fire department or fire protection district member who is
167 employed on a full-time basis and who has a valid concealed
168 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a
169 valid concealed carry permit, when such uses are reasonably
170 associated with or are necessary to the fulfillment of such
171 person's official duties.
172 3. Subdivisions (1)[,] and (5)[, (8), and (10)] of
173 subsection 1 of this section do not apply when the actor is
174 transporting such weapons in a nonfunctioning state or in an
175 unloaded state when ammunition is not readily accessible or
176 when such weapons are not readily accessible. Subdivision
177 (1) of subsection 1 of this section does not apply to any
178 person nineteen years of age or older or eighteen years of
179 age or older and a member of the United States Armed Forces,
180 or honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,
181 transporting a concealable firearm in the passenger
182 compartment of a motor vehicle, so long as such concealable
183 firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed[, nor when the actor
184 is also in possession of an exposed firearm or projectile
185 weapon for the lawful pursuit of game, or is in his or her
186 dwelling unit or upon premises over which the actor has
187 possession, authority or control, or is traveling in a
188 continuous journey peaceably through this state.

SB 1345 16
189 Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this section does not
190 apply if the firearm is otherwise lawfully possessed by a
191 person while traversing school premises for the purposes of
192 transporting a student to or from school, or possessed by an
193 adult for the purposes of facilitation of a school-
194 sanctioned firearm-related event or club event].
195 4. [Subdivisions] Subdivision (1)[, (8), and (10)] of
196 subsection 1 of this section shall not apply to any person
197 who has a valid concealed carry permit issued pursuant to
198 sections 571.101 to 571.121, a valid lifetime or extended
199 concealed carry permit issued under sections 571.205 to
200 571.230, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued before
201 August 28, 2013, or a valid permit or endorsement to carry
202 concealed firearms issued by another state or political
203 subdivision of another state.
204 5. Subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), and (8)[,
205 (9), and (10)] of subsection 1 of this section shall not
206 apply to persons who are engaged in a lawful act of defense
207 pursuant to section 563.031.
208 6. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
209 the contrary, the state shall not prohibit any state
210 employee from having a firearm in the employee's vehicle on
211 the state's property provided that the vehicle is locked and
212 the firearm is not visible. This subsection shall only
213 apply to the state as an employer when the state employee's
214 vehicle is on property owned or leased by the state and the
215 state employee is conducting activities within the scope of
216 his or her employment. For the purposes of this subsection,
217 "state employee" means an employee of the executive,
218 legislative, or judicial branch of the government of the
219 state of Missouri.

SB 1345 17
220 7. (1) Subdivision (10) of subsection 1 of this
221 section shall not apply to a person who is a school officer
222 commissioned by the district school board under section
223 162.215 or who is a school protection officer, as described
224 under section 160.665.
225 (2) Nothing in this section shall make it unlawful for
226 a student to actually participate in school-sanctioned gun
227 safety courses, student military or ROTC courses, or other
228 school-sponsored or club-sponsored firearm-related events,
229 provided the student does not carry a firearm or other
230 weapon readily capable of lethal use into any school, onto
231 any school bus, or onto the premises of any other function
232 or activity sponsored or sanctioned by school officials or
233 the district school board.
234 8. A person who commits the [crime] offense of
235 unlawful use of weapons under:
236 (1) Subdivision (2), (3), (4), or [(11)] (9) of
237 subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a class E
238 felony;
239 (2) Subdivision (1), (6), or (7)[, or (8)] of
240 subsection 1 of this section shall be guilty of a class [B]
241 D misdemeanor, except when a concealed weapon is carried
242 onto any private property whose owner has posted the
243 premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by means
244 of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
245 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the
246 writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch, in
247 which case the [penalties of subsection 2 of section 571.107
248 shall apply] offense shall not be a criminal act but may
249 subject the person to denied access to or removal from the
250 premises. If such person refuses to leave the premises and
251 a peace officer is summoned, such person may be issued a

SB 1345 18
252 citation for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for
253 the first offense. If a second citation for a similar
254 violation occurs within a six-month period, such person
255 shall be fined an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars.
256 If a third or subsequent citation for a similar violation is
257 issued within one year of the first citation, such person
258 shall be fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars;
259 (3) Subdivision (5) [or (10)] of subsection 1 of this
260 section shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the
261 firearm is unloaded and a class E felony if the firearm is
262 loaded;
263 (4) Subdivision [(9)] (8) of subsection 1 of this
264 section shall be guilty of a class B felony, except that if
265 the violation of subdivision [(9)] (8) of subsection 1 of
266 this section results in injury or death to another person,
267 it is a class A felony.
268 9. Violations of subdivision [(9)] (8) of subsection 1
269 of this section shall be punished as follows:
270 (1) For the first violation a person shall be
271 sentenced to the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for
272 a class B felony;
273 (2) For any violation by a prior offender as defined
274 in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to the
275 maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B felony
276 without the possibility of parole, probation or conditional
277 release for a term of ten years;
278 (3) For any violation by a persistent offender as
279 defined in section 558.016, a person shall be sentenced to
280 the maximum authorized term of imprisonment for a class B
281 felony without the possibility of parole, probation, or
282 conditional release;

SB 1345 19
283 (4) For any violation which results in injury or death
284 to another person, a person shall be sentenced to an
285 authorized disposition for a class A felony.
286 10. Any person knowingly aiding or abetting any other
287 person in the violation of subdivision [(9)] (8) of
288 subsection 1 of this section shall be subject to the same
289 penalty as that prescribed by this section for violations by
290 other persons.
291 11. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no
292 person who pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a felony
293 violation of subsection 1 of this section shall receive a
294 suspended imposition of sentence if such person has
295 previously received a suspended imposition of sentence for
296 any other firearms- or weapons-related felony offense.
297 12. As used in this section "qualified retired peace
298 officer" means an individual who:
299 (1) Retired in good standing from service with a
300 public agency as a peace officer, other than for reasons of
301 mental instability;
302 (2) Before such retirement, was authorized by law to
303 engage in or supervise the prevention, detection,
304 investigation, or prosecution of, or the incarceration of
305 any person for, any violation of law, and had statutory
306 powers of arrest;
307 (3) Before such retirement, was regularly employed as
308 a peace officer for an aggregate of fifteen years or more,
309 or retired from service with such agency, after completing
310 any applicable probationary period of such service, due to a
311 service-connected disability, as determined by such agency;
312 (4) Has a nonforfeitable right to benefits under the
313 retirement plan of the agency if such a plan is available;

SB 1345 20
314 (5) During the most recent twelve-month period, has
315 met, at the expense of the individual, the standards for
316 training and qualification for active peace officers to
317 carry firearms;
318 (6) Is not under the influence of alcohol or another
319 intoxicating or hallucinatory drug or substance; and
320 (7) Is not prohibited by federal law from receiving a
321 firearm.
322 13. The identification required by subdivision (1) of
323 subsection 2 of this section is:
324 (1) A photographic identification issued by the agency
325 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
326 officer that indicates that the individual has, not less
327 recently than one year before the date the individual is
328 carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or otherwise
329 found by the agency to meet the standards established by the
330 agency for training and qualification for active peace
331 officers to carry a firearm of the same type as the
332 concealed firearm; or
333 (2) A photographic identification issued by the agency
334 from which the individual retired from service as a peace
335 officer; and
336 (3) A certification issued by the state in which the
337 individual resides that indicates that the individual has,
338 not less recently than one year before the date the
339 individual is carrying the concealed firearm, been tested or
340 otherwise found by the state to meet the standards
341 established by the state for training and qualification for
342 active peace officers to carry a firearm of the same type as
343 the concealed firearm.
344 14. Notwithstanding any provision of this section or
345 any other law to the contrary, the offense of unlawful use

SB 1345 21
346 of weapons under subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this
347 section shall not include possession of a firearm in a
348 vehicle on any premises listed under paragraphs (a) to (j)
349 of subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section, except
350 if prohibited by federal law, so long as the firearm is not
351 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
352 in or on the listed premises.
1 571.069. 1. Any business that elects to prohibit the
2 possession of firearms or other weapons on its premises by
3 posting a sign described under section 571.107 or by another
4 method authorized under this chapter shall assume custodial
5 responsibility for the safety and defense of any person who
6 is authorized to carry firearms or other arms under this
7 chapter while the person is on the premises of the
8 business. The provisions of this section shall not apply to
9 private property not used for commercial purposes or private
10 residences of any type. As used in this section, "business"
11 means any business that sells or provides goods or services
12 to the general public whose annual gross volume sales made
13 or business done is more than five hundred thousand dollars.
14 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the
15 contrary, the requirement to ensure the safety and defense
16 of persons under subsection 1 of this section shall include
17 a mandatory and explicit duty to guard persons authorized to
18 carry firearms or other arms under this chapter against
19 criminal or harmful acts, as such terms are defined in
20 section 537.785, of a third party including, but not limited
21 to, trespassers, employees, customers, or other invitees of
22 the business. The requirement to ensure safety and defense
23 shall also include a duty to guard persons authorized to
24 carry firearms or other arms against vicious animals and
25 wild animals. The duty to guard such persons under this

SB 1345 22
26 section shall apply only to the defense against conduct that
27 could reasonably have been prevented by the use of arms in
28 lawful self-defense. If a business restricts the possession
29 of firearms or other arms, such business shall post,
30 together with the sign required under section 571.107,
31 notice stating that persons authorized to carry firearms or
32 other arms under this chapter are under the custodial
33 responsibility of the business.
34 3. If a person authorized to carry firearms or other
35 arms under this chapter is injured, suffers bodily injury or
36 death, incurs economic loss or expense, or suffers property
37 damage as a result of a business breaching the duty to
38 defend such person, the person shall have a cause of action
39 against the business prohibiting the possession of firearms
40 or other arms under this chapter.
41 4. The standard of proof for any action under this
42 section shall require a plaintiff to show by a preponderance
43 of the evidence that:
44 (1) The plaintiff was authorized to carry firearms or
45 other arms under this chapter;
46 (2) The plaintiff was lawfully prohibited from
47 carrying firearms or other arms by reason of a sign
48 voluntarily posted by a business under section 571.107;
49 (3) The business was not required to prohibit firearms
50 or other arms under state or federal law or by a rule or
51 policy enacted by a political subdivision or the state
52 contracting with such business entity; and
53 (4) The business's prohibition of carrying firearms or
54 other arms was the proximate cause of the damages, loss, or
55 injury suffered by the plaintiff.
56 5. If a plaintiff prevails in an action brought under
57 this section, the plaintiff shall be entitled to actual

SB 1345 23
58 damages sustained as a result of the failure of the business
59 to guard against criminal and harmful acts, and shall also
60 be entitled to recover reasonable attorney's fees, expert
61 witness costs, and court costs.
62 6. An action under this section shall be brought
63 within two years from the date on which the damages, loss,
64 or injury occurred.
65 7. Any business electing to allow invitees, employees,
66 or other guests to lawfully possess firearms or other lawful
67 weapons on its premises as authorized under section 571.107,
68 or other provisions of this chapter, shall not be held
69 liable for any bodily injury or death, economic loss or
70 expense, property damage, emotional distress, or other
71 injury any person suffers while such person is on the
72 premises of the business unless the business, or an owner or
73 agent thereof, acted purposely, in committing or assisting
74 in committing the act that caused such injury.
1 571.101. 1. All applicants for concealed carry
2 permits issued pursuant to subsection 7 of this section must
3 satisfy the requirements of sections 571.101 to 571.121. If
4 the said applicant can show qualification as provided by
5 sections 571.101 to 571.121, the county or city sheriff
6 shall issue a concealed carry permit authorizing the
7 carrying of a concealed firearm on or about the applicant's
8 person or within a vehicle. A concealed carry permit shall
9 be valid from the date of issuance or renewal until five
10 years from the last day of the month in which the permit was
11 issued or renewed, unless the permit expires during a
12 declared state of emergency as provided in chapter 44, then
13 the concealed carry permit shall be valid until the order
14 has been rescinded. The concealed carry permit is valid
15 throughout this state. Although the permit is considered

SB 1345 24
16 valid in the state, a person who fails to renew his or her
17 permit within five years from the date of issuance or
18 renewal shall not be eligible for an exception to a National
19 Instant Criminal Background Check under federal regulations
20 currently codified under 27 CFR 478.102(d), relating to the
21 transfer, sale, or delivery of firearms from licensed
22 dealers. A concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
23 August 28, 2013, shall continue from the date of issuance or
24 renewal until three years from the last day of the month in
25 which the endorsement was issued or renewed to authorize the
26 carrying of a concealed firearm on or about the applicant's
27 person or within a vehicle in the same manner as a concealed
28 carry permit issued under subsection 7 of this section on or
29 after August 28, 2013.
30 2. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant to
31 subsection 7 of this section shall be issued by [the] any
32 sheriff or his or her designee [of the county or city in
33 which the applicant resides] in this state, if the applicant:
34 (1) Is at least nineteen years of age, is a citizen or
35 permanent resident of the United States and either:
36 (a) Has assumed residency in this state; or
37 (b) Is a member of the Armed Forces stationed in
38 Missouri, or the spouse of such member of the military;
39 (2) Is at least nineteen years of age, or is at least
40 eighteen years of age and a member of the United States
41 Armed Forces or honorably discharged from the United States
42 Armed Forces, and is a citizen of the United States and
43 either:
44 (a) Has assumed residency in this state;
45 (b) Is a member of the Armed Forces stationed in
46 Missouri; or

SB 1345 25
47 (c) The spouse of such member of the military
48 stationed in Missouri and nineteen years of age;
49 (3) Has not pled guilty to or entered a plea of nolo
50 contendere or been convicted of a crime punishable by
51 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
52 any state or of the United States other than a crime
53 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
54 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
55 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
56 silencer or gas gun;
57 (4) Has not been convicted of, pled guilty to or
58 entered a plea of nolo contendere to one or more misdemeanor
59 offenses involving crimes of violence within a five-year
60 period immediately preceding application for a concealed
61 carry permit or if the applicant has not been convicted of
62 two or more misdemeanor offenses involving driving while
63 under the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs or the
64 possession or abuse of a controlled substance within a five-
65 year period immediately preceding application for a
66 concealed carry permit;
67 (5) Is not a fugitive from justice or currently
68 charged in an information or indictment with the commission
69 of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding
70 one year under the laws of any state of the United States
71 other than a crime classified as a misdemeanor under the
72 laws of any state and punishable by a term of imprisonment
73 of two years or less that does not involve an explosive
74 weapon, firearm, firearm silencer, or gas gun;
75 (6) Has not been discharged under dishonorable
76 conditions from the United States Armed Forces;
77 (7) Has not engaged in a pattern of behavior,
78 documented in public or closed records, that causes the

SB 1345 26
79 sheriff to have a reasonable belief that the applicant
80 presents a danger to himself or others;
81 (8) Is not adjudged mentally incompetent at the time
82 of application or for five years prior to application, or
83 has not been committed to a mental health facility, as
84 defined in section 632.005, or a similar institution located
85 in another state following a hearing at which the defendant
86 was represented by counsel or a representative;
87 (9) Submits a completed application for a permit as
88 described in subsection 3 of this section;
89 (10) Submits an affidavit attesting that the applicant
90 complies with the concealed carry safety training
91 requirement pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 of section
92 571.111;
93 (11) Is not the respondent of a valid full order of
94 protection which is still in effect;
95 (12) Is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a
96 firearm under section 571.070 or 18 U.S.C. Section 922(g).
97 3. The application for a concealed carry permit issued
98 by the sheriff [of the county of the applicant's residence]
99 shall contain only the following information:
100 (1) The applicant's name, address, telephone number,
101 gender, date and place of birth, and, if the applicant is
102 not a United States citizen, the applicant's country of
103 citizenship and any alien or admission number issued by the
104 Federal Bureau of Customs and Immigration Enforcement or any
105 successor agency;
106 (2) An affirmation that the applicant has assumed
107 residency in Missouri or is a member of the Armed Forces
108 stationed in Missouri or the spouse of such a member of the
109 Armed Forces and is a citizen or permanent resident of the
110 United States;

SB 1345 27
111 (3) An affirmation that the applicant is at least
112 nineteen years of age or is eighteen years of age or older
113 and a member of the United States Armed Forces or honorably
114 discharged from the United States Armed Forces;
115 (4) An affirmation that the applicant has not pled
116 guilty to or been convicted of a crime punishable by
117 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
118 any state or of the United States other than a crime
119 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
120 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
121 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
122 silencer, or gas gun;
123 (5) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
124 convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo
125 contendere to one or more misdemeanor offenses involving
126 crimes of violence within a five-year period immediately
127 preceding application for a permit or if the applicant has
128 not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses
129 involving driving while under the influence of intoxicating
130 liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a controlled
131 substance within a five-year period immediately preceding
132 application for a permit;
133 (6) An affirmation that the applicant is not a
134 fugitive from justice or currently charged in an information
135 or indictment with the commission of a crime punishable by
136 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
137 any state or of the United States other than a crime
138 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
139 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
140 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
141 silencer or gas gun;

SB 1345 28
142 (7) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
143 discharged under dishonorable conditions from the United
144 States Armed Forces;
145 (8) An affirmation that the applicant is not adjudged
146 mentally incompetent at the time of application or for five
147 years prior to application, or has not been committed to a
148 mental health facility, as defined in section 632.005, or a
149 similar institution located in another state, except that a
150 person whose release or discharge from a facility in this
151 state pursuant to chapter 632, or a similar discharge from a
152 facility in another state, occurred more than five years ago
153 without subsequent recommitment may apply;
154 (9) An affirmation that the applicant has received
155 firearms safety training that meets the standards of
156 applicant firearms safety training defined in subsection 1
157 or 2 of section 571.111;
158 (10) An affirmation that the applicant, to the
159 applicant's best knowledge and belief, is not the respondent
160 of a valid full order of protection which is still in effect;
161 (11) A conspicuous warning that false statements made
162 by the applicant will result in prosecution for perjury
163 pursuant to the laws of the state of Missouri; and
164 (12) A government-issued photo identification. This
165 photograph shall not be included on the permit and shall
166 only be used to verify the person's identity for permit
167 renewal, or for the issuance of a new permit due to change
168 of address, or for a lost or destroyed permit.
169 4. [An application for a concealed carry permit shall
170 be made to the sheriff of the county or any city not within
171 a county in which the applicant resides.] An application
172 shall be filed in writing, signed under oath and under the
173 penalties of perjury, and shall state whether the applicant

SB 1345 29
174 complies with each of the requirements specified in
175 subsection 2 of this section. In addition to the completed
176 application, the applicant for a concealed carry permit must
177 also submit the following:
178 (1) A photocopy of a firearms safety training
179 certificate of completion or other evidence of completion of
180 a firearms safety training course that meets the standards
181 established in subsection 1 or 2 of section 571.111; and
182 (2) A nonrefundable permit fee as provided by
183 subsection 11 or 12 of this section.
184 5. (1) Before an application for a concealed carry
185 permit is approved, the sheriff shall make only such
186 inquiries as he or she deems necessary into the accuracy of
187 the statements made in the application. The sheriff may
188 require that the applicant display a Missouri driver's
189 license or nondriver's license or military identification
190 and orders showing the person being stationed in Missouri.
191 In order to determine the applicant's suitability for a
192 concealed carry permit, the applicant shall be
193 fingerprinted. No other biometric data shall be collected
194 from the applicant. The sheriff shall conduct an inquiry of
195 the National Instant Criminal Background Check System within
196 three working days after submission of the properly
197 completed application for a concealed carry permit. If no
198 disqualifying record is identified by these checks at the
199 state level, the fingerprints shall be forwarded to the
200 Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal
201 history record check. Upon receipt of the completed report
202 from the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
203 and the response from the Federal Bureau of Investigation
204 national criminal history record check, the sheriff shall
205 examine the results and, if no disqualifying information is

SB 1345 30
206 identified, shall issue a concealed carry permit within
207 three working days.
208 (2) In the event the report from the National Instant
209 Criminal Background Check System and the response from the
210 Federal Bureau of Investigation national criminal history
211 record check prescribed by subdivision (1) of this
212 subsection are not completed within forty-five calendar days
213 and no disqualifying information concerning the applicant
214 has otherwise come to the sheriff's attention, the sheriff
215 shall issue a provisional permit, clearly designated on the
216 certificate as such, which the applicant shall sign in the
217 presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee. This
218 permit, when carried with a valid Missouri driver's or
219 nondriver's license or a valid military identification,
220 shall permit the applicant to exercise the same rights in
221 accordance with the same conditions as pertain to a
222 concealed carry permit issued under this section, provided
223 that it shall not serve as an alternative to an national
224 instant criminal background check required by 18 U.S.C.
225 Section 922(t). The provisional permit shall remain valid
226 until such time as the sheriff either issues or denies the
227 certificate of qualification under subsection 6 or 7 of this
228 section. The sheriff shall revoke a provisional permit
229 issued under this subsection within twenty-four hours of
230 receipt of any report that identifies a disqualifying
231 record, and shall notify the concealed carry permit system
232 established under subsection 5 of section 650.350. The
233 revocation of a provisional permit issued under this section
234 shall be proscribed in a manner consistent to the denial and
235 review of an application under subsection 6 of this section.
236 6. The sheriff may refuse to approve an application
237 for a concealed carry permit if he or she determines that

SB 1345 31
238 any of the requirements specified in subsection 2 of this
239 section have not been met, or if he or she has a substantial
240 and demonstrable reason to believe that the applicant has
241 rendered a false statement regarding any of the provisions
242 of sections 571.101 to 571.121. If the applicant is found
243 to be ineligible, the sheriff is required to deny the
244 application, and notify the applicant in writing, stating
245 the grounds for denial and informing the applicant of the
246 right to submit, within thirty days, any additional
247 documentation relating to the grounds of the denial. Upon
248 receiving any additional documentation, the sheriff shall
249 reconsider his or her decision and inform the applicant
250 within thirty days of the result of the reconsideration.
251 The applicant shall further be informed in writing of the
252 right to appeal the denial pursuant to subsections 2, 3, 4,
253 and 5 of section 571.114. After two additional reviews and
254 denials by the sheriff, the person submitting the
255 application shall appeal the denial pursuant to subsections
256 2, 3, 4, and 5 of section 571.114.
257 7. If the application is approved, the sheriff shall
258 issue a concealed carry permit to the applicant within a
259 period not to exceed three working days after his or her
260 approval of the application. The applicant shall sign the
261 concealed carry permit in the presence of the sheriff or his
262 or her designee.
263 8. The concealed carry permit shall specify only the
264 following information:
265 (1) Name, address, date of birth, gender, height,
266 weight, color of hair, color of eyes, and signature of the
267 permit holder;
268 (2) The signature of the sheriff issuing the permit;
269 (3) The date of issuance; and

SB 1345 32
270 (4) The expiration date.
271 The permit shall be no larger than two and one-eighth inches
272 wide by three and three-eighths inches long and shall be of
273 a uniform style prescribed by the department of public
274 safety. The permit shall also be assigned a concealed carry
275 permit system county code and shall be stored in sequential
276 number.
277 9. (1) The sheriff shall keep a record of all
278 applications for a concealed carry permit or a provisional
279 permit and his or her action thereon. Any record of an
280 application that is incomplete or denied for any reason
281 shall be kept for a period not to exceed one year. Any
282 record of an application that was approved shall be kept for
283 a period of one year after the expiration and nonrenewal of
284 the permit.
285 (2) The sheriff shall report the issuance of a
286 concealed carry permit or provisional permit to the
287 concealed carry permit system. All information on any such
288 permit that is protected information on any driver's or
289 nondriver's license shall have the same personal protection
290 for purposes of sections 571.101 to 571.121. An applicant's
291 status as a holder of a concealed carry permit, provisional
292 permit, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
293 August 28, 2013, shall not be public information and shall
294 be considered personal protected information. Information
295 retained in the concealed carry permit system under this
296 subsection shall not be distributed to any federal, state,
297 or private entities and shall only be made available for a
298 single entry query of an individual in the event the
299 individual is a subject of interest in an active criminal
300 investigation or is arrested for a crime. A sheriff may

SB 1345 33
301 access the concealed carry permit system for administrative
302 purposes to issue a permit, verify the accuracy of permit
303 holder information, change the name or address of a permit
304 holder, suspend or revoke a permit, cancel an expired
305 permit, or cancel a permit upon receipt of a certified death
306 certificate for the permit holder. Any person who violates
307 the provisions of this subdivision by disclosing protected
308 information shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
309 10. Information regarding any holder of a concealed
310 carry permit, or a concealed carry endorsement issued prior
311 to August 28, 2013, is a closed record. No bulk download or
312 batch data shall be distributed to any federal, state, or
313 private entity, except to MoSMART or a designee thereof.
314 Any state agency that has retained any documents or records,
315 including fingerprint records provided by an applicant for a
316 concealed carry endorsement prior to August 28, 2013, shall
317 destroy such documents or records, upon successful issuance
318 of a permit.
319 11. For processing an application for a concealed
320 carry permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, the
321 sheriff in each county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not
322 to exceed one hundred dollars which shall be paid to the
323 treasury of the county to the credit of the sheriff's
324 revolving fund. This fee shall include the cost to
325 reimburse the Missouri state highway patrol for the costs of
326 fingerprinting and criminal background checks. An
327 additional fee shall be added to each credit card, debit
328 card, or other electronic transaction equal to the charge
329 paid by the state or the applicant for the use of the credit
330 card, debit card, or other electronic payment method by the
331 applicant.

SB 1345 34
332 12. For processing a renewal for a concealed carry
333 permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, the sheriff
334 in each county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not to
335 exceed fifty dollars which shall be paid to the treasury of
336 the county to the credit of the sheriff's revolving fund.
337 13. For the purposes of sections 571.101 to 571.121,
338 the term "sheriff" shall include the sheriff of any county
339 or city not within a county or his or her designee and in
340 counties of the first classification the sheriff may
341 designate the chief of police of any city, town, or
342 municipality within such county.
343 14. For the purposes of this chapter, "concealed carry
344 permit" shall include any concealed carry endorsement issued
345 by the department of revenue before January 1, 2014, and any
346 concealed carry document issued by any sheriff or under the
347 authority of any sheriff after December 31, 2013.
1 571.104. 1. A concealed carry endorsement issued
2 prior to August 28, 2013, shall be suspended or revoked if
3 the concealed carry endorsement holder becomes ineligible
4 for such endorsement under the criteria established in
5 subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (8), and (11) of subsection 2 of
6 section 571.101 or upon the issuance of a valid full order
7 of protection. The following procedures shall be followed:
8 (1) When a valid full order of protection, or any
9 arrest warrant, discharge, or commitment for the reasons
10 listed in subdivision (3), (4), (5), (8), or (11) of
11 subsection 2 of section 571.101, is issued against a person
12 holding a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August
13 28, 2013, upon notification of said order, warrant,
14 discharge or commitment or upon an order of a court of
15 competent jurisdiction in a criminal proceeding, a
16 commitment proceeding or a full order of protection

SB 1345 35
17 proceeding ruling that a person holding a concealed carry
18 endorsement presents a risk of harm to themselves or others,
19 then upon notification of such order, the holder of the
20 concealed carry endorsement shall surrender the driver's
21 license or nondriver's license containing the concealed
22 carry endorsement to the court, officer, or other official
23 serving the order, warrant, discharge, or commitment. The
24 official to whom the driver's license or nondriver's license
25 containing the concealed carry endorsement is surrendered
26 shall issue a receipt to the licensee for the license upon a
27 form, approved by the director of revenue, that serves as a
28 driver's license or a nondriver's license and clearly states
29 the concealed carry endorsement has been suspended. The
30 official shall then transmit the driver's license or a
31 nondriver's license containing the concealed carry
32 endorsement to the circuit court of the county issuing the
33 order, warrant, discharge, or commitment. The concealed
34 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, shall be
35 suspended until the order is terminated or until the arrest
36 results in a dismissal of all charges. The official to whom
37 the endorsement is surrendered shall administratively
38 suspend the endorsement in the concealed carry permit system
39 established under subsection 5 of section 650.350 until such
40 time as the order is terminated or until the charges are
41 dismissed. Upon dismissal, the court holding the driver's
42 license or nondriver's license containing the concealed
43 carry endorsement shall return such license to the
44 individual, and the official to whom the endorsement was
45 surrendered shall administratively return the endorsement to
46 good standing within the concealed carry permit system.
47 (2) Any conviction, discharge, or commitment specified
48 in sections 571.101 to 571.121 shall result in a

SB 1345 36
49 revocation. Upon conviction, the court shall forward a
50 notice of conviction or action and the driver's license or
51 nondriver's license with the concealed carry endorsement to
52 the department of revenue. The department of revenue shall
53 notify the sheriff of the county which issued the
54 certificate of qualification for a concealed carry
55 endorsement. The sheriff who issued the certificate of
56 qualification prior to August 28, 2013, shall report the
57 change in status of the endorsement to the concealed carry
58 permit system established under subsection 5 of section
59 650.350. The director of revenue shall immediately remove
60 the endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, from the
61 individual's driving record within three days of the receipt
62 of the notice from the court. The director of revenue shall
63 notify the licensee that he or she must apply for a new
64 license pursuant to chapter 302 which does not contain such
65 endorsement. This requirement does not affect the driving
66 privileges of the licensee. The notice issued by the
67 department of revenue shall be mailed to the last known
68 address shown on the individual's driving record. The
69 notice is deemed received three days after mailing.
70 2. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant to
71 sections 571.101 to 571.121 after August 28, 2013, shall be
72 suspended or revoked if the concealed carry permit holder
73 becomes ineligible for such permit or endorsement under the
74 criteria established in subdivisions (3), (4), (5), (8), and
75 (11) of subsection 2 of section 571.101 or upon the issuance
76 of a valid full order of protection. The following
77 procedures shall be followed:
78 (1) When a valid full order of protection or any
79 arrest warrant, discharge, or commitment for the reasons
80 listed in subdivision (3), (4), (5), (8), or (11) of

SB 1345 37
81 subsection 2 of section 571.101 is issued against a person
82 holding a concealed carry permit, upon notification of said
83 order, warrant, discharge, or commitment or upon an order of
84 a court of competent jurisdiction in a criminal proceeding,
85 a commitment proceeding, or a full order of protection
86 proceeding ruling that a person holding a concealed carry
87 permit presents a risk of harm to themselves or others, then
88 upon notification of such order, the holder of the concealed
89 carry permit shall surrender the permit to the court,
90 officer, or other official serving the order, warrant,
91 discharge, or commitment. The permit shall be suspended
92 until the order is terminated or until the arrest results in
93 a dismissal of all charges. The official to whom the permit
94 is surrendered shall administratively suspend the permit in
95 the concealed carry permit system until the order is
96 terminated or the charges are dismissed. Upon dismissal,
97 the court holding the permit shall return such permit to the
98 individual and the official to whom the permit was
99 surrendered shall administratively return the permit to good
100 standing within the concealed carry permit system;
101 (2) Any conviction, discharge, or commitment specified
102 in sections 571.101 to 571.121 shall result in a
103 revocation. Upon conviction, the court shall forward a
104 notice of conviction or action and the permit to the issuing
105 county sheriff. The sheriff who issued the concealed carry
106 permit shall report the change in status of the concealed
107 carry permit to the concealed carry permit system.
108 3. A concealed carry permit shall be renewed for a
109 qualified applicant upon receipt of the properly completed
110 renewal application and the required renewal fee by the
111 issuing county sheriff [of the county of the applicant's
112 residence]. The renewal application shall contain the same

SB 1345 38
113 required information as set forth in subsection 3 of section
114 571.101, except that in lieu of the fingerprint requirement
115 of subsection 5 of section 571.101 and the firearms safety
116 training, the applicant need only display his or her current
117 concealed carry permit. A name-based inquiry of the
118 National Instant Criminal Background Check System shall be
119 completed for each renewal application. The sheriff shall
120 review the results of the report from the National Instant
121 Criminal Background Check System, and when the sheriff has
122 determined the applicant has successfully completed all
123 renewal requirements and is not disqualified under any
124 provision of section 571.101, the sheriff shall issue a new
125 concealed carry permit which contains the date such permit
126 was renewed. The process for renewing a concealed carry
127 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, shall be the
128 same as the process for renewing a permit, except that in
129 lieu of the fingerprint requirement of subsection 5 of
130 section 571.101 and the firearms safety training, the
131 applicant need only display his or her current driver's
132 license or nondriver's license containing an endorsement.
133 Upon successful completion of all renewal requirements, the
134 sheriff shall issue a new concealed carry permit as provided
135 under this subsection.
136 4. A person who has been issued a concealed carry
137 permit, or a certificate of qualification for a concealed
138 carry endorsement prior to August 28, 2013, who fails to
139 file a renewal application for a concealed carry permit on
140 or before its expiration date must pay an additional late
141 fee of ten dollars per month for each month it is expired
142 for up to six months. After six months, the sheriff who
143 issued the expired concealed carry permit or certificate of
144 qualification shall notify the concealed carry permit system

SB 1345 39
145 that such permit is expired and cancelled. If the person
146 has a concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28,
147 2013, the sheriff who issued the certificate of
148 qualification for the endorsement shall notify the director
149 of revenue that such certificate is expired regardless of
150 whether the endorsement holder has applied for a concealed
151 carry permit under subsection 3 of this section. The
152 director of revenue shall immediately remove such
153 endorsement from the individual's driving record and notify
154 the individual that his or her driver's license or
155 nondriver's license has expired. The notice shall be
156 conducted in the same manner as described in subsection 1 of
157 this section. Any person who has been issued a concealed
158 carry permit pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a
159 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
160 who fails to renew his or her application within the six-
161 month period must reapply for a new concealed carry permit
162 and pay the fee for a new application.
163 5. [Any person issued a concealed carry permit
164 pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a concealed
165 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, shall
166 notify the sheriff of the new jurisdiction of the permit or
167 endorsement holder's change of residence within thirty days
168 after the changing of a permanent residence to a location
169 outside the county of permit issuance. The permit or
170 endorsement holder shall furnish proof to the sheriff in the
171 new jurisdiction that the permit or endorsement holder has
172 changed his or her residence. The sheriff in the new
173 jurisdiction shall notify the sheriff in the old
174 jurisdiction of the permit holder's change of address and
175 the sheriff in the old jurisdiction shall transfer any
176 information on file for the permit holder to the sheriff in

SB 1345 40
177 the new jurisdiction within thirty days. The sheriff of the
178 new jurisdiction may charge a processing fee of not more
179 than ten dollars for any costs associated with notification
180 of a change in residence. The sheriff shall report the
181 residence change to the concealed carry permit system, take
182 possession and destroy the old permit, and then issue a new
183 permit to the permit holder. The new address shall be
184 accessible by the concealed carry permit system within three
185 days of receipt of the information. If the person has a
186 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
187 the endorsement holder shall also furnish proof to the
188 department of revenue of his or her residence change. In
189 such cases, the change of residence shall be made by the
190 department of revenue onto the individual's driving record.
191 6.] Any person issued a concealed carry permit
192 pursuant to sections 571.101 to 571.121, or a concealed
193 carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, shall
194 notify the issuing sheriff or his or her designee [of the
195 permit or endorsement holder's county or city of residence]
196 within seven days after actual knowledge of the loss or
197 destruction of his or her permit or driver's license or
198 nondriver's license containing a concealed carry
199 endorsement. The permit or endorsement holder shall furnish
200 a statement to the sheriff that the permit or driver's
201 license or nondriver's license containing the concealed
202 carry endorsement has been lost or destroyed. After
203 notification of the loss or destruction of a permit or
204 driver's license or nondriver's license containing a
205 concealed carry endorsement, the sheriff may charge a
206 processing fee of ten dollars for costs associated with
207 replacing a lost or destroyed permit or driver's license or
208 nondriver's license containing a concealed carry endorsement

SB 1345 41
209 and shall reissue a new concealed carry permit within three
210 working days of being notified by the concealed carry permit
211 or endorsement holder of its loss or destruction. The new
212 concealed carry permit shall contain the same personal
213 information, including expiration date, as the original
214 concealed carry permit.
215 [7.] 6. If a person issued a concealed carry permit,
216 or endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, changes his
217 or her name, the person to whom the permit or endorsement
218 was issued shall obtain a corrected or new concealed carry
219 permit with a change of name from the sheriff who issued the
220 original concealed carry permit or the original certificate
221 of qualification for an endorsement upon the sheriff's
222 verification of the name change. The sheriff may charge a
223 processing fee of not more than ten dollars for any costs
224 associated with obtaining a corrected or new concealed carry
225 permit. The permit or endorsement holder shall furnish
226 proof of the name change to the sheriff within thirty days
227 of changing his or her name and display his or her concealed
228 carry permit or current driver's license or nondriver's
229 license containing a concealed carry endorsement. The
230 sheriff shall report the name change to the concealed carry
231 permit system, and the new name shall be accessible by the
232 concealed carry permit system within three days of receipt
233 of the information.
234 [8.] 7. The person with a concealed carry permit, or
235 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, shall notify
236 the sheriff of a name [or address change] within thirty days
237 of the change. A concealed carry permit and, if applicable,
238 endorsement shall be automatically invalid after one hundred
239 eighty days if the permit or endorsement holder has changed
240 his or her name [or changed his or her residence] and not

SB 1345 42
241 notified the sheriff as required in subsections [5 and 7] 6
242 of this section. The sheriff shall assess a late penalty of
243 ten dollars per month for each month, up to six months and
244 not to exceed sixty dollars, for the failure to notify the
245 sheriff of the change of name [or address] within thirty
246 days.
247 [9.] 8. (1) As used in this subsection, the term
248 "active military member" means any person who is on active
249 duty in the United States Armed Forces, on active state
250 duty, on full-time National Guard duty under Title 32 of the
251 United States Code.
252 (2) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
253 the contrary, if a concealed carry permit, or endorsement
254 issued prior to August 28, 2013, expires while the person
255 issued the permit or endorsement is an active military
256 member, the permit shall be renewed if the person completes
257 the renewal requirements under subsection 3 of this section
258 within two months of returning to Missouri after discharge
259 from such duty or recovery from such incapacitation. Once
260 the two-month period has expired, the provisions of
261 subsection 4 of this section shall apply except the
262 penalties shall begin to accrue upon the expiration of the
263 two-month period described in this subsection rather than on
264 the expiration date of the permit or endorsement.
265 (3) Beginning August 28, 2020, an active military
266 member may complete the renewal of his or her endorsement or
267 permit under subdivision (2) of this subsection by mail. To
268 renew an endorsement or permit by mail, an active military
269 member shall mail to the sheriff who issued his or her
270 permit a renewal application, a copy of his or her current
271 concealed carry permit, a military identification acceptable
272 for in-person renewal of permits, and the renewal fee. The

SB 1345 43
273 active military member may pick up the renewed permit in
274 person or may request the permit be mailed to a provided
275 address by certified mail. The sheriff may require the
276 active military member to pay the postage and insurance
277 costs associated with mailing the permit, but the costs
278 shall not exceed ten dollars.
1 571.107. 1. A concealed carry permit issued pursuant
2 to sections 571.101 to 571.121, a valid lifetime or extended
3 concealed carry permit issued under sections 571.205 to
4 571.230, a valid concealed carry endorsement issued prior to
5 August 28, 2013, or a concealed carry endorsement or permit
6 issued by another state or political subdivision of another
7 state shall authorize the person in whose name the permit or
8 endorsement is issued to carry concealed firearms on or
9 about his or her person or vehicle throughout the state. No
10 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
11 to 571.121, valid lifetime or extended concealed carry
12 permit issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230, valid
13 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
14 or a concealed carry endorsement or permit issued by another
15 state or political subdivision of another state shall
16 authorize any person to carry concealed firearms or knuckles
17 into:
18 (1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or
19 station without the consent of the chief law enforcement
20 officer in charge of that office or station[. Possession of
21 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the office or
22 station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
23 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
24 the vehicle is on the premises;
25 (2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on
26 any election day. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on

SB 1345 44
27 the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal
28 offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the
29 vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises];
30 [(3)] (2) The facility of any adult or juvenile
31 detention or correctional institution, prison or jail[.
32 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any
33 adult, juvenile detention, or correctional institution,
34 prison or jail shall not be a criminal offense so long as
35 the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished
36 while the vehicle is on the premises];
37 [(4)] (3) Any courthouse solely occupied by the
38 municipal, circuit, appellate, or supreme court[,] or any
39 courtrooms, administrative offices, libraries, or other
40 rooms of any such court [whether or not] regardless of
41 whether such court solely occupies the building in question
42 unless the person has the consent of the presiding judge.
43 This subdivision shall also include, but not be limited to,
44 any juvenile, family, drug, or other court offices, any room
45 or office wherein any of the courts or offices listed in
46 this subdivision are temporarily conducting any business
47 within the jurisdiction of such courts or offices[, and such
48 other locations in such manner as may be specified by
49 supreme court rule pursuant to subdivision (6) of this
50 subsection]. Nothing in this subdivision shall preclude
51 those persons listed in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of
52 section 571.030 while within their jurisdiction and on
53 duty[,] or those persons listed in subdivisions (2), (4),
54 and (10) of subsection 2 of section 571.030[, or such other
55 persons who serve in a law enforcement capacity for a court
56 as may be specified by supreme court rule pursuant to
57 subdivision (6) of this subsection] from carrying a
58 concealed firearm within any of the areas described in this

SB 1345 45
59 subdivision[. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
60 premises of any of the areas listed in this subdivision
61 shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is
62 not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle
63 is on the premises;
64 (5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of
65 local government; or any meeting of the general assembly or
66 a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in
67 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding
68 a valid concealed carry permit or endorsement from carrying
69 a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body which he or she
70 is a member. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the
71 premises shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
72 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
73 the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in this subdivision
74 shall preclude a member of the general assembly, a full-time
75 employee of the general assembly employed under Section 17,
76 Article III, Constitution of Missouri, legislative employees
77 of the general assembly as determined under section 21.155,
78 or statewide elected officials and their employees, holding
79 a valid concealed carry permit or endorsement, from carrying
80 a concealed firearm in the state capitol building or at a
81 meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general
82 assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state
83 capitol building;
84 (6) The general assembly, supreme court, county or
85 municipality may by rule, administrative regulation, or
86 ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed
87 firearms by permit or endorsement holders in that portion of
88 a building owned, leased or controlled by that unit of
89 government. Any portion of a building in which the carrying
90 of concealed firearms is prohibited or limited shall be

SB 1345 46
91 clearly identified by signs posted at the entrance to the
92 restricted area. The statute, rule or ordinance shall
93 exempt any building used for public housing by private
94 persons, highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private
95 dwellings owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of
96 government from any restriction on the carrying or
97 possession of a firearm. The statute, rule or ordinance
98 shall not specify any criminal penalty for its violation but
99 may specify that persons violating the statute, rule or
100 ordinance may be denied entrance to the building, ordered to
101 leave the building and if employees of the unit of
102 government, be subjected to disciplinary measures for
103 violation of the provisions of the statute, rule or
104 ordinance. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
105 apply to any other unit of government;
106 (7) Any establishment licensed to dispense
107 intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises, which
108 portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the
109 consent of the owner or manager. The provisions of this
110 subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
111 establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
112 apply to any bona fide restaurant open to the general public
113 having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and
114 that receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual
115 income from the dining facilities by the sale of food. This
116 subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in
117 a vehicle on the premises of the establishment and shall not
118 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
119 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
120 premises. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes any
121 individual who has been issued a concealed carry permit or
122 endorsement to possess any firearm while intoxicated];

SB 1345 47
123 [(8)] (4) Any area of an airport to which access is
124 controlled by the inspection of persons and property[.
125 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the
126 airport shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
127 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
128 the vehicle is on the premises];
129 [(9)] (5) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is
130 prohibited by federal law;
131 [(10)] (6) Any [higher education institution or]
132 public elementary or secondary school facility without the
133 consent of [the governing body of the higher education
134 institution or] a school official or the district school
135 board, unless the person with the concealed carry
136 endorsement or permit is a teacher or administrator of an
137 elementary or secondary school who has been designated by
138 his or her school district as a school protection officer
139 and is carrying a firearm in a school within that district,
140 in which case no consent is required[. Possession of a
141 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any higher education
142 institution or elementary or secondary school facility shall
143 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
144 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
145 on the premises;
146 (11) Any portion of a building used as a child care
147 facility without the consent of the manager. Nothing in
148 this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care
149 facility in a family home from owning or possessing a
150 firearm or a concealed carry permit or endorsement;
151 (12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by
152 the public without the consent of the owner or manager
153 pursuant to rules promulgated by the gaming commission.
154 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a

SB 1345 48
155 riverboat gambling operation shall not be a criminal offense
156 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
157 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
158 (13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession
159 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the amusement
160 park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
161 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the
162 vehicle is on the premises;
163 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship
164 without the consent of the minister or person or persons
165 representing the religious organization that exercises
166 control over the place of religious worship. Possession of
167 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a
168 criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from
169 the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
170 premises];
171 [(15)] (7) Any private property whose owner has posted
172 the premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by
173 means of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place
174 of a minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with
175 the writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch.
176 The owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a
177 private business enterprise, or any other organization,
178 entity, or person may prohibit persons holding a concealed
179 carry permit or endorsement from carrying concealed firearms
180 on the premises and may prohibit employees, not authorized
181 by the employer, holding a concealed carry permit or
182 endorsement from carrying concealed firearms on the property
183 of the employer. If the building or the premises are open
184 to the public, the employer of the business enterprise shall
185 post signs on or about the premises if carrying a concealed
186 firearm is prohibited. [Possession of a firearm in a

SB 1345 49
187 vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so
188 long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
189 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises.] An
190 employer may prohibit employees or other persons holding a
191 concealed carry permit or endorsement from carrying a
192 concealed firearm in vehicles owned by the employer; or
193 [(16)] (8) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating
194 capacity of five thousand or more that is under the
195 management of or leased to a private entity, including a
196 professional sports team. [Possession of a firearm in a
197 vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so
198 long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
199 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
200 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public.
201 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a
202 hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
203 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
204 the vehicle is on the premises.]
205 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm or knuckles in a
206 location specified in subdivisions (1) to [(17)] (8) of
207 subsection 1 of this section by any individual who holds a
208 concealed carry permit issued pursuant to sections 571.101
209 to 571.121, a valid lifetime or extended concealed carry
210 permit issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230, or a
211 concealed carry endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013,
212 shall not be a criminal act but may subject the person to
213 denial to the premises or removal from the premises. If
214 such person refuses to leave the premises and a peace
215 officer is summoned, such person may be issued a citation
216 for an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars for the
217 first offense. If a second citation for a similar violation
218 occurs within a six-month period, such person shall be fined

SB 1345 50
219 an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars and his or her
220 concealed carry permit, [and] or, if applicable, his or her
221 endorsement to carry concealed firearms, shall be suspended
222 for a period of one year. If a third citation for a similar
223 violation is issued within one year of the first citation,
224 such person shall be fined an amount not to exceed five
225 hundred dollars and shall have his or her concealed carry
226 permit, [and] or, if applicable, his or her endorsement,
227 revoked and such person shall not be eligible for a
228 concealed carry permit for a period of three years. Upon
229 conviction of charges arising from a citation issued
230 pursuant to this subsection, the court shall notify the
231 sheriff of the county which issued the concealed carry
232 permit, or, if the person is a holder of a concealed carry
233 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, the court shall
234 notify the sheriff of the county which issued the
235 certificate of qualification for a concealed carry
236 endorsement and the department of revenue. The sheriff
237 shall suspend or revoke the concealed carry permit or, if
238 applicable, the certificate of qualification for a concealed
239 carry endorsement. If the person holds an endorsement, the
240 department of revenue shall issue a notice of such
241 suspension or revocation of the concealed carry endorsement
242 and take action to remove the concealed carry endorsement
243 from the individual's driving record. The director of
244 revenue shall notify the licensee that he or she must apply
245 for a new license pursuant to chapter 302 which does not
246 contain such endorsement. The notice issued by the
247 department of revenue shall be mailed to the last known
248 address shown on the individual's driving record. The
249 notice is deemed received three days after mailing.

SB 1345 51
250 3. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 1 of
251 this section or any other law to the contrary, the
252 provisions of this section shall not prohibit a person from
253 carrying a concealed firearm in a vehicle on any premises
254 listed under subdivisions (1) to (8) of subsection 1 of this
255 section, except if prohibited by federal law, so long as the
256 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
257 the vehicle is in or on the listed premises.
1 571.108. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
2 the contrary, neither the state nor any county, city, town,
3 village, municipality, or other political subdivision of
4 this state shall impose any rule, policy, ordinance,
5 contractual requirement, or agreement of any type that
6 prohibits any employee of such entity who holds a concealed
7 carry permit issued under sections 571.101 to 571.121, a
8 valid lifetime or extended concealed carry permit issued
9 under sections 571.205 to 571.230, a valid concealed carry
10 endorsement issued prior to August 28, 2013, or a concealed
11 carry endorsement or permit issued by another state or
12 political subdivision of another state from carrying a
13 concealed weapon in any area in which such person is
14 authorized to carry a concealed weapon under this chapter.
1 571.109. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to
2 the contrary, a public institution of higher education shall
3 be allowed to construct policies regarding concealed carry
4 permits or endorsements issued under sections 571.101 to
5 571.121, valid lifetime or extended concealed carry permits
6 issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230, valid concealed
7 carry endorsements issued prior to August 28, 2013, or
8 concealed carry endorsements or permits issued by another
9 state or political subdivision of another state, but such
10 policies shall not generally prohibit or have the effect of

SB 1345 52
11 generally prohibiting the carrying, chambering, or active
12 operation or storage of a concealed firearm on the campus of
13 such institution.
14 2. No institution of higher education shall impose any
15 contractual requirement or condition of employment upon any
16 employee, faculty member, or student that generally
17 prohibits or has the effect of generally prohibiting the
18 lawful possession or carry of firearms by such persons, nor
19 shall such institution impose any taxes, fees, or other
20 monetary charges as a condition for the lawful possession or
21 carry of firearms under the provisions of this chapter.
1 571.205. 1. Upon request and payment of the required
2 fee, the sheriff shall issue a concealed carry permit that
3 is valid through the state of Missouri for the lifetime of
4 the permit holder to a Missouri resident who meets the
5 requirements of sections 571.205 to 571.230, known as a
6 Missouri lifetime concealed carry permit. A person may also
7 request, and the sheriff shall issue upon payment of the
8 required fee, a concealed carry permit that is valid through
9 the state of Missouri for a period of either ten years or
10 twenty-five years from the date of issuance or renewal to a
11 Missouri resident who meets the requirements of sections
12 571.205 to 571.230, unless the permit expires during a
13 declared state of emergency as provided in chapter 44, then
14 the lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall be
15 valid until the order has been rescinded. Such permit shall
16 be known as a Missouri extended concealed carry permit. A
17 person issued a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
18 carry permit shall be required to comply with the provisions
19 of sections 571.205 to 571.230. If the applicant can show
20 qualification as provided by sections 571.205 to 571.230,
21 the sheriff shall issue a Missouri lifetime or extended

SB 1345 53
22 concealed carry permit authorizing the carrying of a
23 concealed firearm on or about the applicant's person or
24 within a vehicle.
25 2. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
26 permit shall be suspended if the permit holder becomes a
27 resident of another state. The permit may be reactivated
28 upon reestablishment of Missouri residency if the applicant
29 meets the requirements of sections 571.205 to 571.230, and
30 upon successful completion of a name-based inquiry of the
31 National Instant Background Check System.
32 3. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
33 permit shall be issued by [the] any sheriff or his or her
34 designee [of the county or city in which the applicant
35 resides,] if the applicant:
36 (1) Is at least nineteen years of age, is a citizen or
37 permanent resident of the United States and has assumed
38 residency in this state, or is at least eighteen years of
39 age and a member of the United States Armed Forces or
40 honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces,
41 and is a citizen of the United States and has assumed
42 residency in this state;
43 (2) Has not pled guilty to or entered a plea of nolo
44 contendere or been convicted of a crime punishable by
45 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
46 any state or of the United States, other than a crime
47 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
48 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
49 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
50 silencer, or gas gun;
51 (3) Has not been convicted of, pled guilty to or
52 entered a plea of nolo contendere to one or more misdemeanor
53 offenses involving crimes of violence within a five-year

SB 1345 54
54 period immediately preceding application for a Missouri
55 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or if the
56 applicant has not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor
57 offenses involving driving while under the influence of
58 intoxicating liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a
59 controlled substance within a five-year period immediately
60 preceding application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
61 concealed carry permit;
62 (4) Is not a fugitive from justice or currently
63 charged in an information or indictment with the commission
64 of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding
65 one year under the laws of any state of the United States,
66 other than a crime classified as a misdemeanor under the
67 laws of any state and punishable by a term of imprisonment
68 of two years or less that does not involve an explosive
69 weapon, firearm, firearm silencer, or gas gun;
70 (5) Has not been discharged under dishonorable
71 conditions from the United States Armed Forces;
72 (6) Has not engaged in a pattern of behavior,
73 documented in public or closed records, that causes the
74 sheriff to have a reasonable belief that the applicant
75 presents a danger to himself or herself or others;
76 (7) Is not adjudged mentally incompetent at the time
77 of application or for five years prior to application, or
78 has not been committed to a mental health facility, as
79 defined in section 632.005, or a similar institution located
80 in another state following a hearing at which the defendant
81 was represented by counsel or a representative;
82 (8) Submits a completed application for a permit as
83 described in subsection 4 of this section;

SB 1345 55
84 (9) Submits an affidavit attesting that the applicant
85 complies with the concealed carry safety training
86 requirement under subsections 1 and 2 of section 571.111;
87 (10) Is not the respondent of a valid full order of
88 protection which is still in effect;
89 (11) Is not otherwise prohibited from possessing a
90 firearm under section 571.070 or 18 U.S.C. Section 922(g).
91 4. The application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
92 concealed carry permit issued by the sheriff [of the county
93 of the applicant's residence] shall contain only the
94 following information:
95 (1) The applicant's name, address, telephone number,
96 gender, date and place of birth, and, if the applicant is
97 not a United States citizen, the applicant's country of
98 citizenship and any alien or admission number issued by the
99 United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement or any
100 successor agency;
101 (2) An affirmation that the applicant has assumed
102 residency in Missouri and is a citizen or permanent resident
103 of the United States;
104 (3) An affirmation that the applicant is at least
105 nineteen years of age or is eighteen years of age or older
106 and a member of the United States Armed Forces or honorably
107 discharged from the United States Armed Forces;
108 (4) An affirmation that the applicant has not pled
109 guilty to or been convicted of a crime punishable by
110 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
111 any state or of the United States other than a crime
112 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
113 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
114 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
115 silencer, or gas gun;

SB 1345 56
116 (5) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
117 convicted of, pled guilty to, or entered a plea of nolo
118 contendere to one or more misdemeanor offenses involving
119 crimes of violence within a five-year period immediately
120 preceding application for a permit or that the applicant has
121 not been convicted of two or more misdemeanor offenses
122 involving driving while under the influence of intoxicating
123 liquor or drugs or the possession or abuse of a controlled
124 substance within a five-year period immediately preceding
125 application for a permit;
126 (6) An affirmation that the applicant is not a
127 fugitive from justice or currently charged in an information
128 or indictment with the commission of a crime punishable by
129 imprisonment for a term exceeding one year under the laws of
130 any state or of the United States other than a crime
131 classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of any state and
132 punishable by a term of imprisonment of two years or less
133 that does not involve an explosive weapon, firearm, firearm
134 silencer, or gas gun;
135 (7) An affirmation that the applicant has not been
136 discharged under dishonorable conditions from the United
137 States Armed Forces;
138 (8) An affirmation that the applicant is not adjudged
139 mentally incompetent at the time of application or for five
140 years prior to application, or has not been committed to a
141 mental health facility, as defined in section 632.005, or a
142 similar institution located in another state, except that a
143 person whose release or discharge from a facility in this
144 state under chapter 632, or a similar discharge from a
145 facility in another state, occurred more than five years ago
146 without subsequent recommitment may apply;

SB 1345 57
147 (9) An affirmation that the applicant has received
148 firearms safety training that meets the standards of
149 applicant firearms safety training defined in subsection 1
150 or 2 of section 571.111;
151 (10) An affirmation that the applicant, to the
152 applicant's best knowledge and belief, is not the respondent
153 of a valid full order of protection which is still in effect;
154 (11) A conspicuous warning that false statements made
155 by the applicant will result in prosecution for perjury
156 under the laws of the state of Missouri; and
157 (12) A government-issued photo identification. This
158 photograph shall not be included on the permit and shall
159 only be used to verify the person's identity for the
160 issuance of a new permit, issuance of a new permit due to
161 change of name or address, renewal of an extended permit, or
162 for a lost or destroyed permit, or reactivation under
163 subsection 2 of this section.
164 5. An application for a Missouri lifetime or extended
165 concealed carry permit shall be made to the sheriff [of the
166 county in which the applicant resides] in this state. An
167 application shall be filed in writing, signed under oath and
168 under the penalties of perjury, and shall state whether the
169 applicant complies with each of the requirements specified
170 in subsection 3 of this section. In addition to the
171 completed application, the applicant for a Missouri lifetime
172 or extended concealed carry permit shall also submit the
173 following:
174 (1) A photocopy of a firearms safety training
175 certificate of completion or other evidence of completion of
176 a firearms safety training course that meets the standards
177 established in subsection 1 or 2 of section 571.111; and

SB 1345 58
178 (2) A nonrefundable permit fee as provided by
179 subsection 12 of this section.
180 6. (1) Before an application for a Missouri lifetime
181 or extended concealed carry permit is approved, the sheriff
182 shall make only such inquiries as he or she deems necessary
183 into the accuracy of the statements made in the
184 application. The sheriff may require that the applicant
185 display a Missouri driver's license or nondriver's license
186 or military identification. No biometric data shall be
187 collected from the applicant. The sheriff shall conduct an
188 inquiry of the National Instant Criminal Background Check
189 System within three working days after submission of the
190 properly completed application for a Missouri lifetime or
191 extended concealed carry permit. Upon receipt of the
192 completed report from the National Instant Criminal
193 Background Check System, the sheriff shall examine the
194 results and, if no disqualifying information is identified,
195 shall issue a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
196 permit within three working days.
197 (2) In the event the report from the National Instant
198 Criminal Background Check System and the response from the
199 Federal Bureau of Investigation national criminal history
200 record check prescribed by subdivision (1) of this
201 subsection are not completed within forty-five calendar days
202 and no disqualifying information concerning the applicant
203 has otherwise come to the sheriff's attention, the sheriff
204 shall issue a provisional permit, clearly designated on the
205 certificate as such, which the applicant shall sign in the
206 presence of the sheriff or the sheriff's designee. This
207 permit, when carried with a valid Missouri driver's or
208 nondriver's license, shall permit the applicant to exercise
209 the same rights in accordance with the same conditions as

SB 1345 59
210 pertain to a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
211 permit issued under this section, provided that it shall not
212 serve as an alternative to a national instant criminal
213 background check required by 18 U.S.C. Section 922(t). The
214 provisional permit shall remain valid until such time as the
215 sheriff either issues or denies the permit under subsection
216 7 or 8 of this section. The sheriff shall revoke a
217 provisional permit issued under this subsection within
218 twenty-four hours of receipt of any report that identifies a
219 disqualifying record, and shall notify the concealed carry
220 permit system established under subsection 5 of section
221 650.350. The revocation of a provisional permit issued
222 under this section shall be prescribed in a manner
223 consistent to the denial and review of an application under
224 subsection 7 of this section.
225 7. The sheriff may refuse to approve an application
226 for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
227 if he or she determines that any of the requirements
228 specified in subsection 3 of this section have not been met,
229 or if he or she has a substantial and demonstrable reason to
230 believe that the applicant has rendered a false statement
231 regarding any of the provisions of sections 571.205 to
232 571.230. If the applicant is found to be ineligible, the
233 sheriff is required to deny the application, and notify the
234 applicant in writing, stating the grounds for denial and
235 informing the applicant of the right to submit, within
236 thirty days, any additional documentation relating to the
237 grounds of the denial. Upon receiving any additional
238 documentation, the sheriff shall reconsider his or her
239 decision and inform the applicant within thirty days of the
240 result of the reconsideration. The applicant shall further
241 be informed in writing of the right to appeal the denial

SB 1345 60
242 under section 571.220. After two additional reviews and
243 denials by the sheriff, the person submitting the
244 application shall appeal the denial under section 571.220.
245 8. If the application is approved, the sheriff shall
246 issue a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
247 to the applicant within a period not to exceed three working
248 days after his or her approval of the application. The
249 applicant shall sign the Missouri lifetime or extended
250 concealed carry permit in the presence of the sheriff or his
251 or her designee.
252 9. The Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
253 permit shall specify only the following information:
254 (1) Name, address, date of birth, gender, height,
255 weight, color of hair, color of eyes, and signature of the
256 permit holder;
257 (2) The signature of the sheriff issuing the permit;
258 (3) The date of issuance;
259 (4) A clear statement indicating that the permit is
260 only valid within the state of Missouri; and
261 (5) If the permit is a Missouri extended concealed
262 carry permit, the expiration date.
263 The permit shall be no larger than two and one-eighth inches
264 wide by three and three-eighths inches long and shall be of
265 a uniform style prescribed by the department of public
266 safety. The permit shall also be assigned a concealed carry
267 permit system county code and shall be stored in sequential
268 number.
269 10. (1) The sheriff shall keep a record of all
270 applications for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
271 carry permit or a provisional permit and his or her action
272 thereon. Any record of an application that is incomplete or

SB 1345 61
273 denied for any reason shall be kept for a period not to
274 exceed one year.
275 (2) The sheriff shall report the issuance of a
276 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or
277 provisional permit to the concealed carry permit system.
278 All information on any such permit that is protected
279 information on any driver's or nondriver's license shall
280 have the same personal protection for purposes of sections
281 571.205 to 571.230. An applicant's status as a holder of a
282 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or
283 provisional permit shall not be public information and shall
284 be considered personal protected information. Information
285 retained in the concealed carry permit system under this
286 subsection shall not be distributed to any federal, state,
287 or private entities and shall only be made available for a
288 single entry query of an individual in the event the
289 individual is a subject of interest in an active criminal
290 investigation or is arrested for a crime. A sheriff may
291 access the concealed carry permit system for administrative
292 purposes to issue a permit, verify the accuracy of permit
293 holder information, change the name or address of a permit
294 holder, suspend or revoke a permit, cancel an expired
295 permit, or cancel a permit upon receipt of a certified death
296 certificate for the permit holder. Any person who violates
297 the provisions of this subdivision by disclosing protected
298 information shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
299 11. Information regarding any holder of a Missouri
300 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit is a closed
301 record. No bulk download or batch data shall be distributed
302 to any federal, state, or private entity, except to MoSMART
303 or a designee thereof.

SB 1345 62
304 12. For processing an application, the sheriff in each
305 county shall charge a nonrefundable fee not to exceed:
306 (1) Two hundred dollars for a new Missouri extended
307 concealed carry permit that is valid for ten years from the
308 date of issuance or renewal;
309 (2) Two hundred fifty dollars for a new Missouri
310 extended concealed carry permit that is valid for twenty-
311 five years from the date of issuance or renewal;
312 (3) Fifty dollars for a renewal of a Missouri extended
313 concealed carry permit;
314 (4) Five hundred dollars for a Missouri lifetime
315 concealed carry permit,
316 which shall be paid to the treasury of the county to the
317 credit of the sheriff's revolving fund.
1 571.210. 1. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
2 carry permit issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall
3 be suspended or revoked if the Missouri lifetime or extended
4 concealed carry permit holder becomes ineligible for such
5 permit under the criteria established in subdivision (2),
6 (3), (4), (5), (7), or (10) of subsection 3 of section
7 571.205. The following procedures shall be followed:
8 (1) When a valid full order of protection or any
9 arrest warrant, discharge, or commitment for the reasons
10 listed in subdivision (2), (3), (4), (5), (7), or (10) of
11 subsection 3 of section 571.205 is issued against a person
12 holding a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
13 permit, upon notification of said order, warrant, discharge,
14 or commitment or upon an order of a court of competent
15 jurisdiction in a criminal proceeding, a commitment
16 proceeding, or a full order of protection proceeding ruling
17 that a person holding a Missouri lifetime or extended

SB 1345 63
18 concealed carry permit presents a risk of harm to themselves
19 or others, then upon notification of such order, the holder
20 of the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
21 shall surrender the permit to the court, officer, or other
22 official serving the order, warrant, discharge, or
23 commitment. The permit shall be suspended until the order
24 is terminated or until the arrest results in a dismissal of
25 all charges. The official to whom the permit is surrendered
26 shall administratively suspend the permit in the concealed
27 carry permit system until the order is terminated or the
28 charges are dismissed. Upon dismissal, the court holding
29 the permit shall return such permit to the individual and
30 the official to whom the permit was surrendered shall
31 administratively return the permit to good standing within
32 the concealed carry permit system;
33 (2) Any conviction, discharge, or commitment specified
34 in sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall result in a
35 revocation. Upon conviction, the court shall forward a
36 notice of conviction or action and the permit to the issuing
37 county sheriff. The sheriff who issued the Missouri
38 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall report the
39 change in status of the concealed carry permit to the
40 concealed carry permit system.
41 2. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
42 permit shall be reactivated for a qualified applicant upon
43 receipt of the properly completed application by the issuing
44 sheriff [of the county of the applicant's residence] and in
45 accordance with subsection 2 of section 571.205. A name-
46 based inquiry of the National Instant Criminal Background
47 Check System shall be completed for each reactivation
48 application. The sheriff shall review the results of the
49 report from the National Instant Criminal Background Check

SB 1345 64
50 System, and when the sheriff has determined the applicant
51 has successfully completed all reactivation requirements and
52 is not disqualified under any provision of section 571.205,
53 the sheriff shall issue a new Missouri lifetime or extended
54 concealed carry permit, which contains the date such permit
55 was reactivated.
56 3. Any person issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
57 concealed carry permit shall notify the sheriff or his or
58 her designee where the permit was issued within seven days
59 after actual knowledge of the loss or destruction of his or
60 her permit. The permit holder shall furnish a statement to
61 the sheriff that the permit has been lost or destroyed.
62 After notification of the loss or destruction of a permit,
63 the sheriff may charge a processing fee of ten dollars for
64 costs associated with replacing a lost or destroyed permit
65 and shall reissue a new Missouri lifetime or extended
66 concealed carry permit within three working days of being
67 notified by the permit holder of its loss or destruction.
68 The new Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
69 shall contain the same personal information as the original
70 concealed carry permit.
71 4. If a person issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
72 concealed carry permit changes his or her name, the person
73 to whom the permit was issued shall obtain a corrected or
74 new Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
75 with a change of name from the sheriff who issued the
76 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit or upon
77 the sheriff's verification of the name change. The sheriff
78 may charge a processing fee of not more than ten dollars for
79 any costs associated with obtaining a corrected or new
80 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit. The
81 permit holder shall furnish proof of the name change to the

SB 1345 65
82 sheriff within thirty days of changing his or her name and
83 display his or her Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
84 carry permit. The sheriff shall report the name change to
85 the concealed carry permit system, and the new name shall be
86 accessible by the concealed carry permit system within three
87 days of receipt of the information.
88 5. [Any person issued a Missouri lifetime or extended
89 concealed carry permit shall notify the sheriff of the new
90 jurisdiction of the permit holder's change of residence
91 within thirty days after the changing of a permanent
92 residence to a location outside the county of permit
93 issuance. The permit holder shall furnish proof to the
94 sheriff in the new jurisdiction that the permit holder has
95 changed his or her residence. The sheriff shall report the
96 residence change to the concealed carry permit system, take
97 possession and destroy the old permit, and then issue a new
98 permit to the permit holder. The new address shall be
99 accessible by the concealed carry permit system within three
100 days of receipt of the information.
101 6.] A Missouri extended concealed carry permit shall
102 be renewed for a qualified applicant upon receipt of the
103 properly completed renewal application and payment of the
104 required fee. The renewal application shall contain the
105 same required information as set forth in subsection 3 of
106 section 571.205, except that in lieu of the firearms safety
107 training, the applicant need only display his or her current
108 Missouri extended concealed carry permit. A name-based
109 inquiry of the National Instant Criminal Background Check
110 System shall be completed for each renewal application. The
111 sheriff shall review the results of the report from the
112 National Instant Criminal Background Check System, and when
113 the sheriff has determined the applicant has successfully

SB 1345 66
114 completed all renewal requirements and is not disqualified
115 under any provision of section 571.205, the sheriff shall
116 issue a new Missouri extended concealed carry permit which
117 contains the date such permit was renewed. Upon successful
118 completion of all renewal requirements, the sheriff shall
119 issue a new Missouri extended concealed carry permit as
120 provided under this subsection.
121 [7.] 6. A person who has been issued a Missouri
122 extended concealed carry permit who fails to file a renewal
123 application for a Missouri extended concealed carry permit
124 on or before its expiration date shall pay an additional
125 late fee of ten dollars per month for each month it is
126 expired for up to six months. After six months, the sheriff
127 who issued the expired Missouri extended concealed carry
128 permit shall notify the concealed carry permit system that
129 such permit is expired and cancelled. Any person who has
130 been issued a Missouri extended concealed carry permit under
131 sections 571.101 to 571.121 who fails to renew his or her
132 application within the six-month period shall reapply for a
133 concealed carry permit and pay the fee for a new application.
134 [8.] 7. The sheriff of the county that issued the
135 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall
136 conduct a name-based inquiry of the National Instant
137 Criminal Background Check System once every five years from
138 the date of issuance or renewal of the permit. The sheriff
139 shall review the results of the report from the National
140 Instant Criminal Background Check System. If the sheriff
141 determines the permit holder is disqualified under any
142 provision of section 571.205, the sheriff shall revoke the
143 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit and
144 shall report the revocation to the concealed carry permit
145 system.

SB 1345 67
1 571.215. 1. A Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
2 carry permit issued under sections 571.205 to 571.230 shall
3 authorize the person in whose name the permit is issued to
4 carry concealed firearms on or about his or her person or
5 vehicle throughout the state. No Missouri lifetime or
6 extended concealed carry permit shall authorize any person
7 to carry concealed firearms into[:
8 (1) Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol office or
9 station without the consent of the chief law enforcement
10 officer in charge of that office or station. Possession of
11 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the office or
12 station shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
13 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
14 the vehicle is on the premises;
15 (2) Within twenty-five feet of any polling place on
16 any election day. Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on
17 the premises of the polling place shall not be a criminal
18 offense so long as the firearm is not removed from the
19 vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
20 (3) The facility of any adult or juvenile detention or
21 correctional institution, prison or jail. Possession of a
22 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of any adult, juvenile
23 detention, or correctional institution, prison or jail shall
24 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
25 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
26 on the premises;
27 (4) Any courthouse solely occupied by the circuit,
28 appellate or supreme court, or any courtrooms,
29 administrative offices, libraries, or other rooms of any
30 such court whether or not such court solely occupies the
31 building in question. This subdivision shall also include,
32 but not be limited to, any juvenile, family, drug, or other

SB 1345 68
33 court offices, any room or office wherein any of the courts
34 or offices listed in this subdivision are temporarily
35 conducting any business within the jurisdiction of such
36 courts or offices, and such other locations in such manner
37 as may be specified by supreme court rule under subdivision
38 (6) of this subsection. Nothing in this subdivision shall
39 preclude those persons listed in subdivision (1) of
40 subsection 2 of section 571.030 while within their
41 jurisdiction and on duty, those persons listed in
42 subdivisions (2), (4), and (10) of subsection 2 of section
43 571.030, or such other persons who serve in a law
44 enforcement capacity for a court as may be specified by
45 supreme court rule under subdivision (6) of this subsection
46 from carrying a concealed firearm within any of the areas
47 described in this subdivision. Possession of a firearm in a
48 vehicle on the premises of any of the areas listed in this
49 subdivision shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
50 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
51 the vehicle is on the premises;
52 (5) Any meeting of the governing body of a unit of
53 local government, or any meeting of the general assembly or
54 a committee of the general assembly, except that nothing in
55 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the body holding
56 a valid Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
57 from carrying a concealed firearm at a meeting of the body
58 which he or she is a member. Possession of a firearm in a
59 vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense so
60 long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
61 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises. Nothing in
62 this subdivision shall preclude a member of the general
63 assembly, a full-time employee of the general assembly
64 employed under Section 17, Article III, Constitution of

SB 1345 69
65 Missouri, legislative employees of the general assembly as
66 determined under section 21.155, or statewide elected
67 officials and their employees, holding a valid Missouri
68 lifetime or extended concealed carry permit, from carrying a
69 concealed firearm in the state capitol building or at a
70 meeting whether of the full body of a house of the general
71 assembly or a committee thereof, that is held in the state
72 capitol building;
73 (6) The general assembly, supreme court, county, or
74 municipality may by rule, administrative regulation, or
75 ordinance prohibit or limit the carrying of concealed
76 firearms by permit holders in that portion of a building
77 owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government.
78 Any portion of a building in which the carrying of concealed
79 firearms is prohibited or limited shall be clearly
80 identified by signs posted at the entrance to the restricted
81 area. The statute, rule, or ordinance shall exempt any
82 building used for public housing by private persons,
83 highways or rest areas, firing ranges, and private dwellings
84 owned, leased, or controlled by that unit of government from
85 any restriction on the carrying or possession of a firearm.
86 The statute, rule, or ordinance shall not specify any
87 criminal penalty for its violation but may specify that
88 persons violating the statute, rule, or ordinance may be
89 denied entrance to the building, ordered to leave the
90 building and if employees of the unit of government, be
91 subjected to disciplinary measures for violation of the
92 provisions of the statute, rule, or ordinance. The
93 provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any other
94 unit of government;
95 (7) Any establishment licensed to dispense
96 intoxicating liquor for consumption on the premises, which

SB 1345 70
97 portion is primarily devoted to that purpose, without the
98 consent of the owner or manager. The provisions of this
99 subdivision shall not apply to the licensee of said
100 establishment. The provisions of this subdivision shall not
101 apply to any bona fide restaurant open to the general public
102 having dining facilities for not less than fifty persons and
103 that receives at least fifty-one percent of its gross annual
104 income from the dining facilities by the sale of food. This
105 subdivision does not prohibit the possession of a firearm in
106 a vehicle on the premises of the establishment and shall not
107 be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed
108 from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
109 premises. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes any
110 individual who has been issued a Missouri lifetime or
111 extended concealed carry permit to possess any firearm while
112 intoxicated;
113 (8) Any area of an airport to which access is
114 controlled by the inspection of persons and property.
115 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the
116 airport shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
117 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
118 the vehicle is on the premises;
119 (9) Any place where the carrying of a firearm is
120 prohibited by federal law;
121 (10) Any higher education institution or elementary or
122 secondary school facility without the consent of the
123 governing body of the higher education institution or a
124 school official or the district school board, unless the
125 person with the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
126 carry permit is a teacher or administrator of an elementary
127 or secondary school who has been designated by his or her
128 school district as a school protection officer and is

SB 1345 71
129 carrying a firearm in a school within that district, in
130 which case no consent is required. Possession of a firearm
131 in a vehicle on the premises of any higher education
132 institution or elementary or secondary school facility shall
133 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
134 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
135 on the premises;
136 (11) Any portion of a building used as a child care
137 facility without the consent of the manager. Nothing in
138 this subdivision shall prevent the operator of a child care
139 facility in a family home from owning or possessing a
140 firearm or a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry
141 permit;
142 (12) Any riverboat gambling operation accessible by
143 the public without the consent of the owner or manager under
144 rules promulgated by the gaming commission. Possession of a
145 firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a riverboat gambling
146 operation shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
147 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
148 the vehicle is on the premises;
149 (13) Any gated area of an amusement park. Possession
150 of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of the amusement
151 park shall not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm
152 is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while the
153 vehicle is on the premises;
154 (14) Any church or other place of religious worship
155 without the consent of the minister or person or persons
156 representing the religious organization that exercises
157 control over the place of religious worship. Possession of
158 a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a
159 criminal offense so long as the firearm is not removed from

SB 1345 72
160 the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is on the
161 premises;
162 (15) Any private property whose owner has posted the
163 premises as being off-limits to concealed firearms by means
164 of one or more signs displayed in a conspicuous place of a
165 minimum size of eleven inches by fourteen inches with the
166 writing thereon in letters of not less than one inch. The
167 owner, business or commercial lessee, manager of a private
168 business enterprise, or any other organization, entity, or
169 person may prohibit persons holding a Missouri lifetime or
170 extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed
171 firearms on the premises and may prohibit employees, not
172 authorized by the employer, holding a Missouri lifetime or
173 extended concealed carry permit from carrying concealed
174 firearms on the property of the employer. If the building
175 or the premises are open to the public, the employer of the
176 business enterprise shall post signs on or about the
177 premises if carrying a concealed firearm is prohibited.
178 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises shall
179 not be a criminal offense so long as the firearm is not
180 removed from the vehicle or brandished while the vehicle is
181 on the premises. An employer may prohibit employees or
182 other persons holding a Missouri lifetime or extended
183 concealed carry permit from carrying a concealed firearm in
184 vehicles owned by the employer;
185 (16) Any sports arena or stadium with a seating
186 capacity of five thousand or more. Possession of a firearm
187 in a vehicle on the premises shall not be a criminal offense
188 so long as the firearm is not removed from the vehicle or
189 brandished while the vehicle is on the premises;
190 (17) Any hospital accessible by the public.
191 Possession of a firearm in a vehicle on the premises of a

SB 1345 73
192 hospital shall not be a criminal offense so long as the
193 firearm is not removed from the vehicle or brandished while
194 the vehicle is on the premises] any location listed under
195 subdivisions (1) to (8) of subsection 1 of section 571.107.
196 2. Carrying of a concealed firearm in a location
197 specified in subdivisions (1) to [(17)] (8) of subsection 1
198 of [this] section 571.107 by any individual who holds a
199 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit shall
200 not be a criminal act but may subject the person to denial
201 to the premises or removal from the premises. If such
202 person refuses to leave the premises and a peace officer is
203 summoned, such person may be issued a citation for an amount
204 not to exceed one hundred dollars for the first offense. If
205 a second citation for a similar violation occurs within a
206 six-month period, such person shall be fined an amount not
207 to exceed two hundred dollars and his or her permit to carry
208 concealed firearms shall be suspended for a period of one
209 year. If a third citation for a similar violation is issued
210 within one year of the first citation, such person shall be
211 fined an amount not to exceed five hundred dollars and shall
212 have his or her Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
213 carry permit revoked and such person shall not be eligible
214 for a Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit
215 or a concealed carry permit issued under sections 571.101 to
216 571.121 for a period of three years. Upon conviction of
217 charges arising from a citation issued under this
218 subsection, the court shall notify the sheriff of the county
219 which issued the Missouri lifetime or extended concealed
220 carry permit. The sheriff shall suspend or revoke the
221 Missouri lifetime or extended concealed carry permit.
1 577.703. 1. A person commits the offense of bus
2 hijacking if he or she seizes or exercises control, by force

SB 1345 74
3 or violence or threat of force or violence, of any bus. The
4 offense of bus hijacking is a class B felony.
5 2. The offense of "assault with the intent to commit
6 bus hijacking" is defined as an intimidation, threat,
7 assault or battery toward any driver, attendant or guard of
8 a bus so as to interfere with the performance of duties by
9 such person. Assault to commit bus hijacking is a class D
10 felony.
11 3. Any person, who, in the commission of such
12 intimidation, threat, assault or battery with the intent to
13 commit bus hijacking, employs a dangerous or deadly weapon
14 or other means capable of inflicting serious bodily injury
15 shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a class A felony.
16 [4. Any passenger who boards a bus with a dangerous or
17 deadly weapon or other means capable of inflicting serious
18 bodily injury concealed upon his or her person or effects is
19 guilty of the felony of "possession and concealment of a
20 dangerous or deadly weapon" upon a bus. Possession and
21 concealment of a dangerous and deadly weapon by a passenger
22 upon a bus is a class D felony. The provisions of this
23 subsection shall not apply to duly elected or appointed law
24 enforcement officers or commercial security personnel who
25 are in possession of weapons used within the course and
26 scope of their employment; nor shall the provisions of this
27 subsection apply to persons who are in possession of weapons
28 or other means of inflicting serious bodily injury with the
29 consent of the owner of such bus, his or her agent, or the
30 lessee or bailee of such bus.]
1 577.712. 1. In order to provide for the safety,
2 comfort, and well-being of passengers and others having a
3 bona fide business interest in any terminal, a bus
4 transportation company may refuse admission to terminals to

SB 1345 75
5 any person not having bona fide business within the
6 terminal. Any such refusal shall not be inconsistent or
7 contrary to state or federal laws, regulations pursuant
8 thereto, or to any ordinance of the political subdivision in
9 which such terminal is located. A duly authorized company
10 representative may ask any person in a terminal or on the
11 premises of a terminal to identify himself or herself and
12 state his or her business. Failure to comply with such
13 request or failure to state an acceptable business purpose
14 shall be grounds for the company representative to request
15 that such person leave the terminal. Refusal to comply with
16 such request shall constitute disorderly conduct.
17 Disorderly conduct shall be a class C misdemeanor.
18 2. It is unlawful for any person to carry [a deadly or
19 dangerous weapon or] any explosives or hazardous material
20 into a terminal or aboard a bus. Possession of [a deadly or
21 dangerous weapon,] an explosive or hazardous material shall
22 be a class D felony. Upon the discovery of any such item or
23 material, the company may obtain possession and retain
24 custody of such [item or] material until it is transferred
25 to the custody of law enforcement officers.
1 [563.016. The fact that conduct is
2 justified under this chapter does not abolish or
3 impair any remedy for such conduct which is
4 available in any civil actions.]
✓